Maine, session 132, LD1205.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §6100-OO, sub-§13-A is enacted to read:
13-A. Virtual currency kiosk. "Virtual currency kiosk" means an automated,
unstaffed electronic machine that allows users to engage in money transmission, including
any electronic machine that allows users to engage in money transmission, including any
machine that is capable of accepting or dispensing cash in exchange for virtual currency.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §6100-OO, sub-§13-B is enacted to read:
13-B. Virtual currency kiosk operator. "Virtual currency kiosk operator" means a
person that engages in virtual currency business activity via a virtual currency kiosk located
in this State or a person that owns, operates or manages a virtual currency kiosk located in
this State through which virtual currency business activity is offered.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §6100-VV is enacted to read:
§6100-VV. Virtual currency kiosk operators
Requirements for virtual currency kiosk operators are governed by this section.
1. Transaction limits; dollar amount. A virtual currency kiosk operator may not
accept or dispense more than $1,000 in a day from or to a customer via a virtual currency
kiosk.
2. Transaction charges. A virtual currency kiosk operator may not collect charges,
whether direct or indirect, from a customer related to a single virtual currency kiosk
transaction that exceed the greater of:
A. Five dollars; and
B. Three percent of the United States dollar equivalent of virtual currency assets
involved in the transaction according to the publicly quoted market price of the virtual
currency asset exchange at the time the customer initiates the transaction.
For purposes of this subsection, "single virtual currency kiosk transaction" means the
purchase, sale, exchange, swap or conversion of virtual currency, or the subsequent transfer
of virtual currency, in a series of transactions.
3. License required. A virtual currency kiosk operator must be licensed as a money
transmitter pursuant to this Act unless exempt pursuant to sections 6074 and 6075.
4. Operator accountability. If a virtual currency kiosk operator allows or facilitates
another person to engage in virtual currency business activity via a virtual currency kiosk
in the State that is owned, operated or managed by the virtual currency kiosk operator, the
virtual currency kiosk operator shall ensure that the person engaging in virtual currency
business activity is licensed pursuant to subsection 3 and complies with all other applicable
provisions of this section.
Sec. 4. Report. No later than December 3, 2025, the Commissioner of Professional
and Financial Regulation shall submit a report to the Joint Standing Committee on Health
Coverage, Insurance and Financial Services that includes findings and recommendations
regarding the protection of customers of virtual currency kiosks from fraudulent activity.
The committee may submit legislation related to the report to the Second Regular Session
of the 132nd Legislature.
Page 1 - 132LR0983(01)